not-to-release/fst/nci.lexd
atl:a[tl] # ""
mauhcatlacatl:mauhcatlaca[tl] # ""
mochitlacatl:mochitlaca[tl] # ""
tenzacatl:tenzaca[tl] # ""
cuicatl:cuica[tl] # ""
tocatl:toca[tl] # ""
ocelopetlatl:ocelopetla[tl] # ""
cuitlatl:cuitla[tl] # ""
tilmatli:tilma[tli] # ""
tlazotilmatli:tlazotilma[tli] # ""
teocuitlatl:teocuitla[tl] # ""
amatl:ama[tl] # ""
coatl:coa[tl] # ""
epatl:epa[tl] # ""
quiyahuatl:quiyahua[tl] # ""
tehuatl:tehua[tl] # ""
mazatl:maza[tl] # ""
tepetl:tepe[tl] # ""
altepetl:altepe[tl] # ""
iyetl:iye[tl] # ""
chichitl:chichi[tl] # ""
xochitl:xochi[tl] # ""
macuilxochitl:macuilxochi[tl] # ""
zacamitl:zacami[tl] # ""
cihuateotl:cihuateo[tl] # ""
axolotl:axolo[tl] # ""
icnoyotl:icnoyo[tl] # ""
xiuhcoatl:xiuhcoa[tl] # ""
aaccayotl:aaccayo[tl] # ""
aatl:aa[tl] # ""
acacocoyotl:acacocoyo[tl] # ""
acacoyotl:acacoyo[tl] # ""
acahuatototl:acahuatoto[tl] # ""
acaiyetl:acaiye[tl] # ""
acalcuauhyollotl:acalcuauhyollo[tl] # ""
acalpatiyotl:acalpatiyo[tl] # ""
acaltetl:acalte[tl] # ""
acamallotetl:acamallote[tl] # ""
acametl:acame[tl] # ""
acatepozzotl:acatepozzo[tl] # ""
acatl:aca[tl] # ""
acaxilotl:acaxilo[tl] # ""
acaxochitl:acaxochi[tl] # ""
acayotl:acayo[tl] # ""
achalchiuhtetl:achalchiuhte[tl] # ""
achitlacotl:achitlaco[tl] # ""
achiyotetl:achiyote[tl] # ""
achiyotl:achiyo[tl] # ""
achyotl:achyo[tl] # ""
acocohxochitl:acocohxochi[tl] # ""
acocoyotl:acocoyo[tl] # ""
acontepetl:acontepe[tl] # ""
acoyotl:acoyo[tl] # ""
acpatl:acpa[tl] # ""
acuauhyotl:acuauhyo[tl] # ""
acuecuexatl:acuecuexa[tl] # ""
acuecueyalotl:acuecueyalo[tl] # ""
acuecueyotl:acuecueyo[tl] # ""
acueyotl:acueyo[tl] # ""
acuillotl:acuillo[tl] # ""
acuilloxochitl:acuilloxochi[tl] # ""
acxoyatl:acxoya[tl] # ""
ahahuillotl:ahahuillo[tl] # ""
ahahuiyalizxochitl:ahahuiyalizxochi[tl] # ""
ahchiuhcayotl:ahchiuhcayo[tl] # ""
ahcilitl:ahcili[tl] # ""
ahcolhuahcayotl:ahcolhuahcayo[tl] # ""
ahcolnacayotl:ahcolnacayo[tl] # ""
ahcoltetl:ahcolte[tl] # ""
ahcuallotl:ahcuallo[tl] # ""
ahcualticayotl:ahcualticayo[tl] # ""
ahhuatl:ahhua[tl] # ""
ahhuayoxochitl:ahhuayoxochi[tl] # ""
ahhuelitilizzotl:ahhuelitilizzo[tl] # ""
ahhuiyacatl:ahhuiyaca[tl] # ""
ahhuiyacaxochitl:ahhuiyacaxochi[tl] # ""
ahhuiyacayotl:ahhuiyacayo[tl] # ""
ahhuiyactlacotl:ahhuiyactlaco[tl] # ""
ahiuhcayotl:ahiuhcayo[tl] # ""
ahmolxochitl:ahmolxochi[tl] # ""
ahnencayotl:ahnencayo[tl] # ""
ahnezcalihcayotl:ahnezcalihcayo[tl] # ""
ahompayotl:ahompayo[tl] # ""
ahpanehcayotl:ahpanehcayo[tl] # ""
ahquimahmatcayotl:ahquimahmatcayo[tl] # ""
ahquimahmatilizzotl:ahquimahmatilizzo[tl] # ""
ahtlacayotl:ahtlacayo[tl] # ""
ahtlamatcayotl:ahtlamatcayo[tl] # ""
ahtlatl:ahtla[tl] # ""
ahtlazohyotl:ahtlazohyo[tl] # ""
ahuacachiyahuallotl:ahuacachiyahuallo[tl] # ""
ahuacaxochitl:ahuacaxochi[tl] # ""
ahuatecolotl:ahuatecolo[tl] # ""
ahuatl:ahua[tl] # ""
ahuauhtetl:ahuauhte[tl] # ""
ahuaxocotl:ahuaxoco[tl] # ""
ahuehuetl:ahuehue[tl] # ""
ahuexotl:ahuexo[tl] # ""
ahuilcuicatl:ahuilcuica[tl] # ""
ahuillotl:ahuillo[tl] # ""
ahuilnemilizzotl:ahuilnemilizzo[tl] # ""
ahuilquizcayotl:ahuilquizcayo[tl] # ""
ahuitzotl:ahuitzo[tl] # ""
ahuiyacayotl:ahuiyacayo[tl] # ""
ahyecyotl:ahyecyo[tl] # ""
ahyocoxcayotl:ahyocoxcayo[tl] # ""
ahyollohcayotl:ahyollohcayo[tl] # ""
aitzcuauhconetl:aitzcuauhcone[tl] # ""
aitztetl:aitzte[tl] # ""
aiyetl:aiye[tl] # ""
aiztetl:aizte[tl] # ""
alotlachcayotl:alotlachcayo[tl] # ""
aloyotl:aloyo[tl] # ""
altepenanyotl:altepenanyo[tl] # ""
altepetl:altepe[tl] # ""
amalacotl:amalaco[tl] # ""
amalacoxochitl:amalacoxochi[tl] # ""
amamachiyotl:amamachiyo[tl] # ""
amamalacotl:amamalaco[tl] # ""
amantecayotl:amantecayo[tl] # ""
amapotl:amapo[tl] # ""
amatl:ama[tl] # ""
amaxochitl:amaxochi[tl] # ""
amaxocotl:amaxoco[tl] # ""
ameyalatl:ameyala[tl] # ""
ameyallotl:ameyallo[tl] # ""
amilotetl:amilote[tl] # ""
amilpancayotl:amilpancayo[tl] # ""
amilpanecayotl:amilpanecayo[tl] # ""
amochipopozoquillotl:amochipopozoquillo[tl] # ""
amochitl:amochi[tl] # ""
amoxcualnezcayotl:amoxcualnezcayo[tl] # ""
amoxquimiliuhcayotl:amoxquimiliuhcayo[tl] # ""
amoyotl:amoyo[tl] # ""
amozotl:amozo[tl] # ""
anahuacayotl:anahuacayo[tl] # ""
anayotl:anayo[tl] # ""
aneucyotl:aneucyo[tl] # ""
anillotl:anillo[tl] # ""
aocoxochitl:aocoxochi[tl] # ""
aoztotl:aozto[tl] # ""
apanatl:apana[tl] # ""
apancayotl:apancayo[tl] # ""
apanyotl:apanyo[tl] # ""
apizotl:apizo[tl] # ""
apizteotl:apizteo[tl] # ""
apizzotl:apizzo[tl] # ""
apochquiyotl:apochquiyo[tl] # ""
apopozoquillotl:apopozoquillo[tl] # ""
apozonaltentetl:apozonaltente[tl] # ""
aquehhuatl:aquehhua[tl] # ""
aquiletl:aquile[tl] # ""
aquilotl:aquilo[tl] # ""
atecochatl:atecocha[tl] # ""
atenhuexotl:atenhuexo[tl] # ""
atetepeyotl:atetepeyo[tl] # ""
atetl:ate[tl] # ""
atexcaloztotl:atexcalozto[tl] # ""
aticpaccalquicihuatl:aticpaccalquicihua[tl] # ""
atl:a[tl] # ""
atlacomolatl:atlacomola[tl] # ""
atlacotl:atlaco[tl] # ""
atlancayotl:atlancayo[tl] # ""
atochiyetl:atochiye[tl] # ""
atolatl:atola[tl] # ""
atollacotl:atollaco[tl] # ""
atototl:atoto[tl] # ""
atoyaatl:atoyaa[tl] # ""
atoyatetl:atoyate[tl] # ""
atoyatl:atoya[tl] # ""
atoyaxocotl:atoyaxoco[tl] # ""
atzaccayotl:atzaccayo[tl] # ""
atzapotl:atzapo[tl] # ""
atzatzamolxochitl:atzatzamolxochi[tl] # ""
atzcalxochitl:atzcalxochi[tl] # ""
atzitzihuahcayotl:atzitzihuahcayo[tl] # ""
atzoatl:atzoa[tl] # ""
atzoyatl:atzoya[tl] # ""
atztzapotl:atztzapo[tl] # ""
axcancayotl:axcancayo[tl] # ""
axiloxochitl:axiloxochi[tl] # ""
axitl:axi[tl] # ""
axixtlacotl:axixtlaco[tl] # ""
axochiatl:axochia[tl] # ""
axochitl:axochi[tl] # ""
axocotl:axoco[tl] # ""
axoqueniyetl:axoqueniye[tl] # ""
ayacachetl:ayacache[tl] # ""
ayacachtecayotl:ayacachtecayo[tl] # ""
ayatl:aya[tl] # ""
ayauhcozamalotl:ayauhcozamalo[tl] # ""
ayauhxochitl:ayauhxochi[tl] # ""
ayaxcanyotl:ayaxcanyo[tl] # ""
ayocahcallotl:ayocahcallo[tl] # ""
ayocoxochitl:ayocoxochi[tl] # ""
ayohconetl:ayohcone[tl] # ""
ayohpaltehuilotl:ayohpaltehuilo[tl] # ""
ayohtetl:ayohte[tl] # ""
ayohxochitl:ayohxochi[tl] # ""
ayotl:ayo[tl] # ""
azcalcoyotl:azcalcoyo[tl] # ""
azcalxochitl:azcalxochi[tl] # ""
azcapapalotl:azcapapalo[tl] # ""
azcatl:azca[tl] # ""
azcaxochitl:azcaxochi[tl] # ""
azoquitl:azoqui[tl] # ""
aztacoyotl:aztacoyo[tl] # ""
aztalxochitl:aztalxochi[tl] # ""
aztatl:azta[tl] # ""
aztaxochitl:aztaxochi[tl] # ""
chachahuatototl:chachahuatoto[tl] # ""
chachalacametl:chachalacame[tl] # ""
chachalotl:chachalo[tl] # ""
chachictetl:chachicte[tl] # ""
chahuapapalotl:chahuapapalo[tl] # ""
chahuayotl:chahuayo[tl] # ""
chalcaayatl:chalcaaya[tl] # ""
chalcayaoyotl:chalcayaoyo[tl] # ""
chalcayotl:chalcayo[tl] # ""
chalchiuhcuauhtentetl:chalchiuhcuauhtente[tl] # ""
chalchiuhiyexochitl:chalchiuhiyexochi[tl] # ""
chalchiuhtentetl:chalchiuhtente[tl] # ""
chalchiuhtlapaltototl:chalchiuhtlapaltoto[tl] # ""
chalchiuhxochitl:chalchiuhxochi[tl] # ""
chalchiuhyacamitl:chalchiuhyacami[tl] # ""
chalmecacihuatl:chalmecacihua[tl] # ""
chamolcoyotl:chamolcoyo[tl] # ""
chanehcaconetl:chanehcacone[tl] # ""
chapoltepecayotl:chapoltepecayo[tl] # ""
chapoltepetl:chapoltepe[tl] # ""
chiauhcoatl:chiauhcoa[tl] # ""
chicahuacayotl:chicahuacayo[tl] # ""
chicahualizzotl:chicahualizzo[tl] # ""
chicalotl:chicalo[tl] # ""
chichicayotl:chichicayo[tl] # ""
chichictlacotl:chichictlaco[tl] # ""
chichihualatl:chichihuala[tl] # ""
chichihualayoatl:chichihualayoa[tl] # ""
chichihualayotl:chichihualayo[tl] # ""
chichihualixamexcayotl:chichihualixamexcayo[tl] # ""
chichihualxitomatl:chichihualxitoma[tl] # ""
chichihualxochitl:chichihualxochi[tl] # ""
chichiltzapotl:chichiltzapo[tl] # ""
chichimecatlahtohcayotl:chichimecatlahtohcayo[tl] # ""
chichimecayotl:chichimecayo[tl] # ""
chichipelotl:chichipelo[tl] # ""
chichiucnauhtetl:chichiucnauhte[tl] # ""
chichiyotl:chichiyo[tl] # ""
chichyotl:chichyo[tl] # ""
chicomexochitl:chicomexochi[tl] # ""
chiconahuatl:chiconahua[tl] # ""
chiconcoatl:chiconcoa[tl] # ""
chicoyaotl:chicoyao[tl] # ""
chicoyotl:chicoyo[tl] # ""
chictzapotl:chictzapo[tl] # ""
chicuacemolotl:chicuacemolo[tl] # ""
chicuetetl:chicuete[tl] # ""
chihchihualxochitl:chihchihualxochi[tl] # ""
chihchiuhcayotl:chihchiuhcayo[tl] # ""
chilamilotl:chilamilo[tl] # ""
chilatl:chila[tl] # ""
chilchotl:chilcho[tl] # ""
chilcotl:chilco[tl] # ""
chillacotl:chillaco[tl] # ""
chilpanxochitl:chilpanxochi[tl] # ""
chilpopotl:chilpopo[tl] # ""
chiltototl:chiltoto[tl] # ""
chilxochitl:chilxochi[tl] # ""
chilzolotl:chilzolo[tl] # ""
chimalacaxochitl:chimalacaxochi[tl] # ""
chimalxochitl:chimalxochi[tl] # ""
chimouhcayotl:chimouhcayo[tl] # ""
chinampanecayotl:chinampanecayo[tl] # ""
chipahuacatl:chipahuaca[tl] # ""
chipahuacayotl:chipahuacayo[tl] # ""
chipauhcayotl:chipauhcayo[tl] # ""
chipilotl:chipilo[tl] # ""
chipincayotl:chipincayo[tl] # ""
chipitzapotl:chipitzapo[tl] # ""
chiquiuhyotl:chiquiuhyo[tl] # ""
chiucnauhatl:chiucnauha[tl] # ""
chiucnauholotl:chiucnauholo[tl] # ""
chiucnauhtetl:chiucnauhte[tl] # ""
chiyahuacayotl:chiyahuacayo[tl] # ""
chiyahuallotl:chiyahuallo[tl] # ""
chiyahuizatl:chiyahuiza[tl] # ""
chiyahuizzotl:chiyahuizzo[tl] # ""
chiyamatl:chiyama[tl] # ""
chiyancuauhconetl:chiyancuauhcone[tl] # ""
chiyancuauhtetl:chiyancuauhte[tl] # ""
chiyantlacotl:chiyantlaco[tl] # ""
chiyantototl:chiyantoto[tl] # ""
chiyauhcoatl:chiyauhcoa[tl] # ""
chocolatl:chocola[tl] # ""
chohcholohcayotl:chohcholohcayo[tl] # ""
chonchayotl:chonchayo[tl] # ""
chontalcayotl:chontalcayo[tl] # ""
chopilotentetl:chopilotente[tl] # ""
chopilotetl:chopilote[tl] # ""
chopilotl:chopilo[tl] # ""
cacahuaatl:cacahuaa[tl] # ""
cacahuacacalotl:cacahuacacalo[tl] # ""
cacahuaizquixochitl:cacahuaizquixochi[tl] # ""
cacahuapozonallotl:cacahuapozonallo[tl] # ""
cacahuapozonillotl:cacahuapozonillo[tl] # ""
cacahuatetl:cacahuate[tl] # ""
cacahuaxipehuallotl:cacahuaxipehuallo[tl] # ""
cacahuaxochitl:cacahuaxochi[tl] # ""
cacalacaxochitl:cacalacaxochi[tl] # ""
cacalotetl:cacalote[tl] # ""
cacalotl:cacalo[tl] # ""
cacaloxochitl:cacaloxochi[tl] # ""
cacaocotl:cacaoco[tl] # ""
cacaxtlacotl:cacaxtlaco[tl] # ""
cactihcacayotl:cactihcacayo[tl] # ""
cacxochitl:cacxochi[tl] # ""
caczolehuayotl:caczolehuayo[tl] # ""
cahcallotl:cahcallo[tl] # ""
cahtzotl:cahtzo[tl] # ""
cahuallotlapachiuhcayotl:cahuallotlapachiuhcayo[tl] # ""
calaquiyanyotl:calaquiyanyo[tl] # ""
calatl:cala[tl] # ""
calcayotl:calcayo[tl] # ""
calcayotl:calcayo[tl] # ""
calcuiyatl:calcuiya[tl] # ""
calehcayotl:calehcayo[tl] # ""
calixcuatl:calixcua[tl] # ""
calixxotl:calixxo[tl] # ""
callotl:callo[tl] # ""
calpanconetl:calpancone[tl] # ""
calpanpillotl:calpanpillo[tl] # ""
calpixcayotl:calpixcayo[tl] # ""
caltepipitzotl:caltepipitzo[tl] # ""
calyollotl:calyollo[tl] # ""
camachalcuauhyotl:camachalcuauhyo[tl] # ""
camaixxotl:camaixxo[tl] # ""
camatetl:camate[tl] # ""
camatlapachiuhcayotl:camatlapachiuhcayo[tl] # ""
camaxochitl:camaxochi[tl] # ""
canahuacayotl:canahuacayo[tl] # ""
canauhcoatl:canauhcoa[tl] # ""
canauhconetl:canauhcone[tl] # ""
canauhtetl:canauhte[tl] # ""
capollotl:capollo[tl] # ""
capotztictototl:capotztictoto[tl] # ""
caquizticayotl:caquizticayo[tl] # ""
catzahuacayotl:catzahuacayo[tl] # ""
catzotl:catzo[tl] # ""
caxahpazconetl:caxahpazcone[tl] # ""
caxcaxtototl:caxcaxtoto[tl] # ""
caxtololotl:caxtololo[tl] # ""
caxtoltetl:caxtolte[tl] # ""
cececatl:cececa[tl] # ""
cecentetl:cecente[tl] # ""
ceceyotl:ceceyo[tl] # ""
cehualatl:cehuala[tl] # ""
cehuallotl:cehuallo[tl] # ""
celicayotl:celicayo[tl] # ""
cemaxcaitl:cemaxcai[tl] # ""
cemilhuitequitl:cemilhuitequi[tl] # ""
cemiztetl:cemizte[tl] # ""
cemmitl:cemmi[tl] # ""
cemolotl:cemolo[tl] # ""
cempohualtetl:cempohualte[tl] # ""
cempohualxochitl:cempohualxochi[tl] # ""
cempohualzotl:cempohualzo[tl] # ""
cencoatl:cencoa[tl] # ""
centeconetl:centecone[tl] # ""
centeotl:centeo[tl] # ""
centequitl:centequi[tl] # ""
centetl:cente[tl] # ""
centlacotl:centlaco[tl] # ""
centlaixxotl:centlaixxo[tl] # ""
centlaniyotl:centlaniyo[tl] # ""
centlazotl:centlazo[tl] # ""
centzontototl:centzontoto[tl] # ""
cenyaotl:cenyao[tl] # ""
cenzotl:cenzo[tl] # ""
cetcayotl:cetcayo[tl] # ""
cetl:ce[tl] # ""
cetlacayotl:cetlacayo[tl] # ""
ceuhcayotl:ceuhcayo[tl] # ""
